Vermont statutes. Title 22 Libraries, History, and Information Technology
Subchapter 2. Incorporation of Libraries

§ 101.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter,

“Municipality” means a town, city, or incorporated village only and shall not include school districts, incorporated school or fire districts, or any other governmental incorporated units.

“Public library” means any library established and maintained by a municipality or by a private association, corporation, or group to provide basic library services free of charge to all residents of a municipality or a community and which receives its annual financial support in whole or in part from public funds.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 28

, § 4.

§ 102.
General authority; procedure.

Trustees to whom real or personal property is devised, bequeathed, granted, conveyed, or donated for the foundation and establishment of a public library, may, unless otherwise provided by the devisor, grantor, or donor of the property, in order to promote the establishment, maintenance, and management of the library, form a corporation under the provisions of this section and section 103 of this title.

The trustees may make, sign and acknowledge, and file in the office of the Secretary of State a statement in writing setting forth the intent of the trustees to form a corporation, a copy of the will or instrument by which the endowment of such library is provided, the name adopted for the corporation, which shall not be the name of a corporation already existing, and the name of the municipality in which the library and the principal place of business of the corporation will be located, the managers who may be designated trustees, managers, or directors of such corporation, and the names of the trustees, managers, or directors who are to constitute the original board and who shall hold office until their successors are elected and qualified as provided in section 106 of this title.

The Secretary of State shall, upon receipt of the statement, issue to the incorporators, under seal, a certificate of which the statement shall be a part, declaring that the organization of the corporation is perfected. The incorporators shall record the certificate in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the library is to be located. Upon recording of the certificate, the corporation shall be deemed fully organized and may proceed to carry out its corporate purposes and receive by conveyance from the trustees the property provided for the endowment of the library. The corporation may hold the property in whatever form it was received or conveyed by the trustees, until that form is changed by action of the corporation.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 28

, § 5.

§ 103.
Powers generally.

An organization formed under the provisions of section 102 of this title shall be a body corporate and politic to be known by the name stated in its certificate.
It shall have and possess the ordinary rights and incidents of a corporation, and shall be capable of taking, holding, and disposing of real and personal estate for the purposes of its organization.
The provisions of a will, deed, or other instrument by which an endowment of a library is provided, and accepted by the trustees, managers, or directors shall, as to such endowment, be a part of the organic and fundamental law of such corporation.

§ 104.
Public libraries; trustees, managers, or directors.

The trustees, managers, or directors of such corporation shall compose its members and shall not be more than 15 nor less than five in number.

HISTORY:

Amended

1999, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 79, eff. May 24, 2000.

§ 105.
General powers.

The trustees, managers, or directors shall elect the officers of the corporation from their number and have the control and management of the affairs and property of the corporation, may accept donations and, in their discretion, hold the donations in the form in which they are given for the purposes of science, literature, and art germane to the objects and purposes of the corporation.
They may, in their discretion, receive by loan books, manuscripts, works of art, and other library materials and hold or circulate them under the conditions specified by the owners.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 28

, § 6.

§ 106.
Vacancies.

They may fill by election vacancies occurring in their number.

When a trustee, manager, or director is elected to fill a vacancy, a certificate under the seal of the corporation, giving the name of the person elected, shall be recorded in the office of the county clerk where the articles of incorporation are recorded.

HISTORY:

Amended

1963, No. 16

, eff. March 20, 1963.

§ 107.
Bylaws.

They may make bylaws for the management of such corporation and library.
The bylaws shall set forth the officers of the corporation and define and prescribe their respective duties.

§ 108.
Employment of agents and employees.

They may appoint and employ from time to time agents and employees as they may deem necessary for the efficient administration and conduct of the library and all the affairs of such corporation.

§ 109.
Exemption from taxation.

When the instrument providing the endowment declares that the institution shall be a free public library, such library and other property of the corporation shall be forever exempt from taxation.

§ 110.
Merger.

Two or more library corporations in the same municipality or in different municipalities may, by a majority vote of the members of all the corporations, at meetings warned for that purpose, unite and assume the corporate name of any one of the corporations.
The plan of incorporation shall contain regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 28

, § 7.

§ 111.
Protection of library property; penalties.

A library may recover in a civil action damages for detained or damaged library property, together with costs and reasonable attorney’s fees.

A person who willfully damages, defaces, or removes without authorization any recording, book, or object available for public use or loan from a library or repository of public records or documents or who detains any library property for more than 30 days after a written notice to return the property has been mailed shall be fined not more than $ 500.00 for each offense. Each piece of library property shall be a single offense.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 28

, § 8.